Missouri, session 2026, HB3177.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 537, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 537.298, to read as follows:
537.298. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Area of the racing facility", the area within a three-mile radius of the
perimeter of the parcel or contiguous group of parcels upon which a racing facility is
located;
(2) "Racing facility", a designated area or facility where competitive vehicle or
motorsport races are conducted, including the racetrack, spectator areas, pits, garages,
staging areas, parking, administrative buildings, and associated grounds or
appurtenances used to conduct or support racing events;
(3) "Substantial compliance", operation consistent with applicable federal, state,
and local laws, regulations, ordinances, and permits, allowing for minor nonmaterial
deviations that are promptly corrected.
2. A racing facility shall not be subject to a civil action for public or private
nuisance, inverse condemnation, or similar theory by a surrounding property owner for
typical racing activities if:
(1) The developer or operator of the racing facility obtained all permits required
for construction or operation and established a vested right in the development of the
property or contiguous group of properties where the racing facility is located; and
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3177 2
(2) The permits and vested right described in subdivision (1) of this subsection
were obtained before the surrounding property owner either purchased real property or
constructed any building within the area of the racing facility.
3. Typical racing activities conducted in substantial compliance with applicable
laws and permits, including engine noise, public address systems, track lighting, dust
from competition, race-day traffic, and event scheduling, shall not constitute a public or
private nuisance.
4. (1) The immunity in this section shall not apply to conduct that materially
violates applicable environmental, safety, building, zoning, or noise laws, regulations,
ordinances, or permits.
(2) Nothing in this section shall immunize willful or reckless misconduct,
activities outside permitted racing operations, or a substantial change in use that
materially increases impacts beyond those contemplated by existing permits and
approvals.
5. No state agency, county, or municipality shall bring a civil action alleging
nuisance against a racing facility for typical racing activities conducted in substantial
compliance with applicable laws, regulations, ordinances, or permits, provided, nothing
herein limits enforcement for material violations or offenses unrelated to racing
activities.
6. (1) Except as expressly provided in this section, nothing in this section shall
alter the rights or remedies available under this chapter, including section 537.296, or
under chapters authorizing municipal nuisance proceedings, including section 82.1025.
(2) This section shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes and shall
not be construed to impair any contract or vested right.
✔